Massachusetts, session 194th, H2675.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 32 of Chapter 135 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby amended by
adding, in subsection 121F(s) after the term “section 131” the following: section 131F
of 1